Arkansas, session 2025, SB179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301, concerning special revenues
enumerated, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(276) Those insurance premium taxes as specified in § 26-57-610.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 6, Subchapter 8, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-6-845. Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program Premium Tax Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the "Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program Premium Tax Fund".
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-6-301(276), there to be used for the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program as
set out in § 23-88-601 et seq.
(c)(1) The fund shall be administered by and disbursed at the
direction of the Insurance Commissioner.
(2) Moneys shall not be appropriated from the fund for any
*ANS142*
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
purpose except for the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program.
(d) All moneys deposited into the fund shall not be subject to a
deduction, tax, levy, or other type of assessment.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-75-119(a), concerning the premium tax on
hospital and medical services corporations, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The officers of every foreign or alien corporation, and the
officers of every domestic corporation, transacting business under this
chapter shall, at the time of making its annual statement, file with the
Insurance Commissioner a sworn statement of its net direct written premiums
for the year ending December 31 next preceding from subscribers residing in
this state and shall pay into the State Treasury a premium tax of two and
one-half percent (2.5%) on its net direct written premiums in compliance with
the provisions of § 26-57-601 et seq. as a tax for the privilege of
transacting business in this state.
(2) The total premium tax levied under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section shall be levied in two (2) parts as follows:
(A) After the distribution of the amount stated under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, twelve million dollars ($12,000,000), or
as much as remains available for a total of twelve million dollars
($12,000,000), shall be deposited into the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program
Premium Tax Fund to be used for the purposes stated under § 23-88-610; and
(B) The remainder of revenues shall be deposited into the
State Treasury as general revenues.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-76-131(c), concerning the distribution
of the tax revenue generated by the tax on premiums paid to health
maintenance organizations, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The premium tax levied under this section shall be levied in
two (2) parts as follows:
(A) After the distribution of the amount computed under
subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, twelve million dollars ($12,000,000),
or as much as remains available for a total of twelve million dollars
($12,000,000), shall be deposited into the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program
Premium Tax Fund to be used for the purposes stated under § 23-88-610; and
(B) The remainder of revenues shall be deposited into the
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
State Treasury as general revenues.
(2) The commissioner shall deposit all taxes collected under
this section into the State Treasury as general revenues as follows:
(A) After the distribution of the amount stated under
subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, twelve million dollars ($12,000,000),
or as much as remains available for a total of twelve million dollars
($12,000,000), shall be deposited into the fund to be used for the purposes
stated under § 23-88-610; and
(B) The remainder of revenues shall be deposited into the
State Treasury as general revenues.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 88, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 6 — Strengthen Arkansas Homes Act

23-88-601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Strengthen
Arkansas Homes Act".

23-88-602. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Certificate of compliance" means a certificate of
compliance with the most recent version of an applicable FORTIFIED Home
construction standard from the Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety
or a successor entity;
(2) "Construct" means to build, equip, install, or otherwise
develop insurable property;
(3) "Cost to upgrade a single-family dwelling" means the cost
required to upgrade a single-family dwelling to meet or exceed the
construction standards required for the dwelling to comply with the most
recent version of an applicable FORTIFIED Home construction standards
published by the Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety or a
successor entity;
(4)(A) "Insurable dwelling" means a single-family dwelling that
is a detached structure and is located on, or affixed to, residential real
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
estate.
(B) "Insurable dwelling" does not include manufactured
homes, mobile homes, or condominiums;
(5) "Non-FORTIFIED dwelling" means a dwelling that does not
comply with the most recent version of an applicable FORTIFIED Home
construction standards published by the Insurance Institute for Business &
Home Safety or a successor entity; and
(6)(A) "Retrofitting" is the process of modifying an existing
building or structure after it has been constructed and occupied.
(B) "Retrofitting" includes retrofit.

23-88-603. Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program.
(a) There is established within the State Insurance Department the
Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program.
(b) The program is created for the purpose of providing financial
grants to real property owners and nonprofit organizations to assist and
promote the mitigation of losses to insurable dwellings due to catastrophic
wind events, including hail, according to FORTIFIED Home construction
standards published by the Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety or
a successor entity.
(c) This subchapter does not create an entitlement for a property
owner or obligate the state to fund the inspection, construction, or
retrofitting of residential property in this state.
(d) The department may apply for financial grants to construct or
retrofit insurable dwellings to resist loss due to a tornado, other
catastrophic windstorm events, or hail and deposit the funds into the
Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program Premium Tax Fund.
(e)(1) The department may make grants or funding available to a
nonprofit entity for a project to construct or retrofit an insurable dwelling
to resist loss due to a tornado, other catastrophic windstorm events, or hail
if the grant or funding to a nonprofit entity is allowable under grant or
funding rules, requirements, guidelines, or criteria.
(2) A nonprofit entity under subdivision (e)(1) of this section
shall:
(A) Agree to administer the grants or funding as the
program would be required to administer grants or funding; and
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
(B) Provide documentation to the department in a timely
manner as requested by the department.
(f)(1) Loss mitigation projects shall be based upon the securing of
required local permits and applicable inspections in keeping with local
building codes and the Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety's
FORTIFIED Home construction standards as adopted by rule by the Insurance
Commissioner.
(2) A loss mitigation project is subject to random reinspection
of all projects under the program.

23-88-604. Eligibility.
(a)(1) The owner of an insurable dwelling is eligible to apply for a
grant under the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program if the owner of an
insurable dwelling meets the eligibility requirements as stated by the State
Insurance Department for each grant type, either FORTIFIED Roof or FORTIFIED
Silver.
(2) The eligibility requirements under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section shall include without limitation:
(A) That the residential property owner shall own an
insurable dwelling that has been granted a homestead exemption;
(B) That the owner of the insurable dwelling shall claim
his or her primary residence in a county where grants are being approved;
(C) That an insurable dwelling to be constructed or
retrofitted shall be an owner-occupied single-family primary residence;
(D)(i) That the insurable dwelling shall be in good repair
unless damaged by a tornado, other catastrophic windstorm events, or hail,
and the insurable dwelling owner is eligible to receive a grant under the
Strengthen Arkansas Homes Act.
(ii) The home repair shall not be part of an
insurance claim;
(E)(i) That an evaluator certified by the Insurance
Institute for Business & Home Safety shall:
(a) Prequalify the insurable dwelling as
suitable for construction or retrofitting under the Strengthen Arkansas Homes
Program; and
(b) Identify improvements required to achieve
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
an Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety FORTIFIED Roof, FORTIFIED
Silver, or successor designation, or a similar standard approved by rule by
the Insurance Commissioner.
(ii) An insurable dwelling owner shall:
(a) Select the evaluator under subdivision
(a)(2)(E)(i) of this section from a list provided by the department under the
Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program; and
(b) Pay the evaluator's fee out-of-pocket; and
(F) That the insurable dwelling owner shall:
(i) Obtain bids from at least three (3) contractors
certified by the Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety and approved
under the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program unless three (3) contractors
certified by the Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety are not
available to provide bids in a geographic area where grants are offered, then
a bid equivalent to the number of available contractors certified by the
Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety is acceptable;
(ii) Construct or retrofit the insurable dwelling to
the Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety FORTIFIED Roof or
FORTIFIED Silver designation, or successor designation, or a similar standard
approved by rule by the commissioner, which shall include a hail supplement;
(iii)(a) Provide proof of an in-force policy
providing wind insurance on the insurable dwelling.
(b) If the insurable dwelling owner does not
have wind insurance at the time of the grant application, he or she shall
provide proof of wind insurance coverage within thirty (30) days from the
time the insurable dwelling receives certification from the Insurance
Institute for Business & Home Safety; and
(iv)(a) If the insurable dwelling is in a Special
Flood Hazard Area, provide proof of an in-force flood insurance policy.
(b) The flood insurance policy under
subdivision (a)(2)(F)(iv)(a) of this section may be from the National Flood
Insurance Program or a private carrier.
(b) An applicant for a Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program grant under
this subchapter shall file an application with the department in the form and
manner prescribed by the commissioner.
(c) Documents, materials, and other information submitted to the
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
department by the owner of an insurable dwelling or an insurance company in
support of a Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program grant application shall be
confidential and not subject to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-
19-101 et seq.
(d)(1) Documents, materials, and other information submitted to the
department by the owner of an insurable dwelling or an insurance company
shall not be:
(A) Subject to a public records request under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.;
(B) Subject to subpoena;
(C) Subject to discovery; or
(D) Admissible in evidence in a private civil action.
(2) Subdivision (d)(1) of this section does not:
(A) Apply to the disclosure of documents, materials, or
other information to Arkansas Legislative Audit or to the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee as otherwise authorized by law; or
(B) Preclude the subpoena authority under §§ 10-3-411 and
10-4-421.
(e) The owner of insurable dwelling shall use Strengthen Arkansas
Homes Program grant funds to retrofit an insurable dwelling to resist loss
due to a tornado, other catastrophic windstorm events, or hail.
(f)(1) A loss mitigation project shall be completed within three (3)
months of the date the applicant receives notice of the Strengthen Arkansas
Homes Program grant approval.
(2) Failure to complete the project in the time allotted under
subdivision (f)(1) of this section may result in forfeiture of the Strengthen
Arkansas Homes Program grant.
(g)(1) Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program grant funds shall only be
paid once a certificate has been issued for the Insurance Institute for
Business & Home Safety FORTIFIED Roof or FORTIFIED Silver designation, or
successor designation, as approved by the commissioner.
(2) The Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program grant funds shall be
paid by the commissioner, on behalf of the owner of the insurable dwelling,
directly to the contractor who performed the loss mitigation work.
(h)(1) The department shall accept Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program
grant applications on a first-come, first-served basis.
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
(2) An application submitted under subdivision (h)(1) of this
section shall be given priority if the applicant:
(A) Lives in a location that, based on historical data,
has a higher susceptibility to tornadoes, other catastrophic windstorm
events, or hail; or
(B) Meets any other criteria the commissioner determines
is appropriate to meet the purpose of the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program.
(i) An entity providing funds to the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program
shall be permitted to establish additional rules and guidelines under which
those funds may be used if the rules and guidelines do not violate any state
or federal law or department rules.
(j) The department may conduct a random audit of funds, records, and
properties to detect fraud or for any other reason.

23-88-605. Contractor requirements.
(a) Under the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program, the owner of an
insurable dwelling shall hire a contractor certified by the Insurance
Institute for Business & Home Safety who can perform work that satisfies the
standards under this subchapter and the rules adopted by the Insurance
Commissioner.
(b) The State Insurance Department shall not endorse or otherwise
provide preferential treatment to a contractor.
(c)(1) The owner of an insurable dwelling is responsible for an amount
owed to a contractor that exceeds awarded program grant funds.
(2) The amount owed to a contractor that exceeds the awarded
program grant funds shall be disclosed to the owner, reflected on the bid
sheet, and approved by the owner before work begins.
(3) A contractor shall not bill the owner for additional
expenses after retrofit work is completed.
(d) To be eligible to work on a project funded by the program as a
contractor, a contractor shall:
(1) Meet the program requirements under subsection (e) of this
section; and
(2) Maintain a current copy of all applicable certificates,
licenses, and proof of insurance coverages with the program office.
(e) The program requirements for a contractor to participate in the
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
program include without limitation:
(1) That the contractor holds a valid and active contractor's
license or registration in Arkansas and is free from all disciplinary action
by the applicable licensing board;
(2) That the contractor is registered to do business in Arkansas
with the Secretary of State;
(3) That the contractor has an in-force general liability policy
with at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in liability coverage;
(4) That the contractor has workers' compensation and employer's
liability insurance as required by Arkansas law;
(5)(A) That the contractor holds an active Insurance Institute
for Business & Home Safety FORTIFIED Roof contractor certification or
FORTIFIED professional certification.
(B) The contractor is responsible for paying all fees
associated with certification and training;
(6) That the contractor has successfully registered as a
supplier or payee with the Department of Finance and Administration;
(7) That the contractor shall maintain accurate contact
information with the State Insurance Department and notify the State
Insurance Department within ten (10) days of any changes in his or her
contact information;
(8) That the contractor agrees to follow the program's
procedures and rules as promulgated by the commissioner;
(9) That the contractor shall not have a financial interest in a
project funded by the program for which the contractor performs work other
than receiving payment on behalf of the owner of an insurable dwelling from
the program;
(10) That the contractor shall report to the program any
potential conflict of interest before work commences; and
(11) That the contractor shall not be the evaluator for a
project funded under the program.

23-88-606. Evaluator requirements.
(a) To be eligible to work on a project funded by the Strengthen
Arkansas Homes Program as an evaluator, an evaluator shall:
(1) Meet the program requirements under subsection (b) of this
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
section; and
(2) Maintain a current copy of all applicable certificates,
licenses, and proof of insurance coverage with the program office.
(b) The program requirements for a contractor to participate in the
program include:
(1)(A) That the evaluator is in good standing with the Insurance
Institute for Business & Home Safety and maintains an active Insurance
Institute for Business & Home Safety certification as a FORTIFIED Home
evaluator, or other certification under a successor entity of the Insurance
Institute for Business & Home Safety.
(B) The evaluator shall pay all fees associated with
certification and training;
(2) If applicable, that the evaluator is registered to do
business in Arkansas with the Secretary of State;
(3) That the evaluator agrees to follow the program's procedures
and rules as promulgated by the Insurance Commissioner;
(4) That the evaluator shall maintain accurate contact
information with the State Insurance Department and notify the department
within ten (10) days of any changes in his or her contact information;
(5) That the evaluator shall not have a financial interest in
any project that the evaluator inspects for designation purposes for the
program;
(6) That the evaluator shall not be a contractor or supplier of
any materials, products, or systems installed in a project the evaluator
inspects for designation purposes for the program;
(7) That the evaluator shall not be the sales agent for a
project being designated for the program; and
(8) That the evaluator agrees to inform the department of a
potential conflict of interest.

23-88-607. Premium discount.
(a) An insurance company that writes property insurance for wind or
hail coverage of any property located in this state that has been certified
compliant with the most recent version of any applicable FORTIFIED Home
construction standards published by the Insurance Institute for Business &
Home Safety or a successor entity:
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
(1) Shall provide a premium discount or rate reduction on the
coverage if the discount or reduction is actuarially justified; or
(2) May provide:
(A) A premium discount or rate reduction on the coverage
according to any standard discount amounts, targets, or benchmarks
established under subsection (e) of this section; and
(B) Any other adjustment on the coverage.
(b) A premium discount, rate reduction, or other adjustment provided
under subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to the rate filing and
other applicable regulatory requirements, including without limitation § 23-
67-201 et seq.
(c) An insurance company that offers a premium discount, rate
reduction, or other adjustment under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall
provide the discount, reduction, or adjustment on the coverage of an
insurable dwelling located in this state if the insurance company receives a
copy of the certificate of compliance for the real property.
(d) An insurance company shall receive a copy of the certificate of
compliance in order to provide a premium discount, rate reduction, or other
adjustment under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(e)(1) The Insurance Commissioner may promulgate rules that establish
standard discount amounts, targets, or benchmarks for the coverage of any
real property located in this state that has been certified compliant with
the most recent version of any applicable FORTIFIED Home construction
standards published by the Insurance Institute for Business & Home Safety or
a successor entity.
(2) Any standard discount amounts, targets, or benchmarks
promulgated by the commissioner shall be:
(A) Optional; and
(B) Primarily for the benefit of insurance companies that
are unable to obtain actuarially valid data to provide a premium discount or
rate reduction under subdivision (a)(1) of this section due to inadequate
resources or experience.

23-88-608. Policy endorsement for roof loss or repairs.
An insurance company writing property insurance for personal risks that
provides coverage of a single-family dwelling located in this state that is a
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
non-FORTIFIED dwelling shall offer an optional rider, endorsement, or
supplemental policy provision that provides the insured a right to receive
claim payments for the cost to upgrade a single-family dwelling for a claim
that:
(1) Is covered under the insurance policy or contract; and
(2) Requires replacement of the covered insured dwelling’s roof
as defined by the insurance policy or contract.

23-88-609. Insurer requirements.
A property insurer subject to §§ 23-88-607 and 23-88-608 shall:
(1) Make any filings required under §§ 23-88-607 and 23-88-608;
(2) Comply with any other regulatory requirements required under
§ 23-67-201 et seq.; and
(3) Comply with any other laws that are necessary to ensure
that:
(A) Any premium discount or rate reduction required under
§ 23-88-607 is offered on an insurance policy or contract issued or renewed
on and after July 1, 2026; and
(B) The optional rider, endorsement, or supplemental
policy provision required under § 23-88-608 is offered on an insurance policy
or contract issued or renewed on and after July 1, 2026.

23-88-610. Use of insurance premium taxes.
(a) Insurance premium taxes shall be used to fund the Strengthen
Arkansas Homes Program as follows:
(1) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to fund the grant program;
and
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to defray the
administrative costs to implement and administer the program.
(b) Disbursements shall be made on forms prescribed by the Insurance
Commissioner.
(c) Any excess or surplus insurance premium taxes that are not
expended or allocated for expenditure under this subchapter within each
twelve-month period shall be remitted to general revenues.

23-88-611. Rules.
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
(a) The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules to implement and
administer this subchapter.
(b) The rules promulgated under subsection (a) of this section shall
include eligibility requirements necessary for the proper administration of
this subchapter and eligibility requirements under any instructions or
requirements on grants or funds received by the commissioner for the
Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-57-603(d), concerning insurance premium
tax reports, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) Each authorized, unauthorized, or formerly authorized domestic,
foreign, and alien insurer shall pay to the Treasurer of State through the
commissioner, as a tax imposed for the privilege of transacting business in
this state, a tax upon the net premiums and net considerations, except as
provided in § 26-57-605.
(2)(A) The tax shall be computed thereon at a rate of two and
one-half percent (2½%).
(B) For entities subject to § 26-57-604(a), the premium
tax levied under this section shall be levied in two (2) parts as follows:
(i) Twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) shall be
deposited into the Strengthen Arkansas Homes Program Premium Tax Fund; and
(ii) The remainder of revenues shall be deposited
into the State Treasury as general revenues.
(3) The premiums written shall be reported at such times and in
such form and context as prescribed by the commissioner, and the taxes shall
be paid on a quarterly estimate basis as prescribed by the commissioner and
shall be reconciled annually at the time of filing the annual report required
in subsections (a)-(c) of this section.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-57-610(b)(3), concerning the disposition
of insurance premium tax revenues, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) The taxes collected under subdivision (b)(3)(B) of this
section and §§ 26-57-604 and 26-57-605 shall be classified as general
revenues, and the net amount of taxes collected under §§ 26-57-604 and 26-57-
605 shall be credited to the various State Treasury funds participating in
general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by and to
02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB179
be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization
Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.; and
(B) The revenues from the part of the premium tax
identified in § 26-57-603(d)(2)(B)(i) shall be deposited in the Strengthen
Arkansas Homes Program Premium Tax Fund.

SECTION 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective on and after January
1, 2026.

/s/J. Boyd


























02-10-2025 11:19:48 ANS142